Florida, session 2026, SB18.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 163 164 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 165 found and declared to be true. 166 Section 2.âThe Broward County Sheriffâs Office is 167 authorized and directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise 168 encumbered and to draw a warrant in the sum of $2,588,258.50 169 payable to the Estate of M.N. as compensation for injuries and 170 damages sustained. 171 Section 3.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that all 172 government liens, including Medicaid liens, resulting from the 173 treatment and care of M.N. for the occurrences described in this 174 act be waived and paid by the state. 175 Section 4.âThe amount paid by the Broward County Sheriffâs 176 Office pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount 177 awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 178 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 179 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 180 injuries and damages to the Estate of M.N. The total amount paid 181 for attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 182 percent of the total amount awarded under this act. 183 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.